src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
аски-мӧдлун+Adv:аски-мӧдлун ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
аскомысь+Adv:аскомысь ADV-TEMP_  "ylihuomenna" ;
бордйыв+Adv:бордйыл ADV_L  "siivillä" ;
бӧръявыв+Adv:бӧръявыл ADV_L  "lopulta" ;
бӧрланьӧ+Adv:бӧрланьӧ ADV-IS_APRILL  "" ;
бӧрланьысь+Adv:бӧрланьысь ADV-IS_APRELA  "" ;
бӧрланьын+Adv:бӧрланьын ADV-IS_APRINE  "" ;
бӧрӧд+Adv:бӧрӧд ADV-IS_PRL  "" ;
вемӧсӧн+Adv:вемӧсӧн ADV-STATE  "" ;
веськыдладорын+Adv:веськыдладорын ADV-IS_INE  "" ;
воддзаысь+Adv:воддзаысь ADV-ITER_  "" ;
воддзаӧн+Adv:воддзаӧн ADV-IS_INS  "" ;
водзвылӧ+Adv:водзвылӧ ADV-IS_ILL  "" ;
водзвылысь+Adv:водзвылысь ADV-IS_ELA  "" ;
водзвывлань+Adv:водзвывлань ADV-IS_APR  "" ;
водзвылӧдз+Adv:водзвылӧдз ADV-IS_TER  "" ;
водзладорсянь+Adv:водзладорсянь ADV-IS_EGR  "" ;
водзланьын+Adv:водзланьын ADV-IS_APRINE  "" ;
водзланьысь+Adv:водзланьысь ADV-IS_APRELA  "" ;
водзланьӧ+Adv:водзланьӧ ADV-IS_APRILL  "" ;
выльвылысь+Adv:выльвылысь ADV-IS_ELA  "" ;
выльлаті+Adv:выльлаті ADV-IS_TRA  "" ;
гоз-мӧдысь+Adv:гоз-мӧдысь ADV-ITER_  "" ;
горӧдмӧн+Adv:горӧдмӧн ADV-IS_GER-MON  "" ;
гӧгӧрын+Adv:гӧгӧрын ADV-IS_INE  "" ;
гӧнечӧн+Adv:гӧнечӧн ADV-IS_INS  "" ;
гӧрдӧдтӧдз+Adv:гӧрдӧдтӧдз ADV-VTER  "" ;
джынйӧдз+Adv:джынйӧдз ADV-IS_TER  "" ;
дзебсьӧмӧн+Adv:дзебсьӧмӧн ADV-IS_GER-OMON  "" ;
дзескыдапырысь+Adv:дзескыдапырысь ADV_  "" ;
дзув+Adv:дзул ADV_L  "läpi" ;
дзурс+Adv:дзурс ADV-DEG_  "aivan" ;
доймытӧдз+Adv:доймытӧдз ADV-VTER  "" ;
дузгӧдчӧмӧн+Adv:дузгӧдчӧмӧн ADV-IS_GER-OMON  "" ;
дӧзмытӧг+Adv:дӧзмытӧг ADV-IS_GER-TOG  "" ;
жаляддзатӧг+Adv:жаляддзатӧг ADV-IS_ADV-TOG  "" ;
звӧйкйӧн+Adv:звӧйкйӧн ADV-IS_INS  "" ;
ичӧтвывсянь+Adv:ичӧтвывсянь ADV-IS_EGR  "" ;
казьтылігӧн+Adv:казьтылігӧн ADV-IS_GER-IGON  "" ;
кельдӧдмӧн+Adv:кельдӧдмӧн ADV-IS_GER-MON  "" ;
келігӧн+Adv:келігӧн ADV-IS_GER-IGON  "" ;
кералігӧн+Adv:кералігӧн ADV-IS_GER-IGON  "" ;
кикутігӧн+Adv:кикутігӧн ADV-IS_GER-IGON  "" ;
коддзытӧдз+Adv:коддзытӧдз ADV-VTER  "" ;
кодйысьӧмӧн+Adv:кодйысьӧмӧн ADV-IS_GER-OMON  "" ;
кор+Adv:кор ADV-REL-TEMP_  "kun" ;
кор-нибудь+Adv:кор-нибудь ADV-INDEF_  "" ;
корджык+Adv:корджык ADV-REL-TEMP_  "(tarkemmin) milloin" ;
кор-некор+Adv:кор-некор AdvTemp  "" ;
кук+Adv:кук ADV-DEG_  "" ;
кутчысьтӧг+Adv:кутчысьтӧг ADV-IS_GER-TOG  "" ;
кывкӧрталигӧн+Adv:кывкӧрталигӧн ADV-IS_INS  "" ;
кызвынлалань+Adv:кызвынлалань ADV-IS_APR  "" ;
кызсьыв+Adv:кызсьыл ADV_L  "" ;
кык% пӧв+Adv:кык% пӧв ADV-MULT_  "kahteen kertaan" ;
кыкысь-куимысь+Adv:кыкысь-куимысь CARD-ITER-APPR  "" ;
кышыда+Adv:кышыда ADV_  "" ;
луна+Adv:луна AdvTemp  "" ;
лӧзӧдтӧдз+Adv:лӧзӧдтӧдз ADV-VTER  "" ;
матіникын+Adv:матіникын ADV-IS_INE  "" ;
матӧ+Adv:матӧ ADV-IS_ILL  "lähes" ;
мукӧдлаланьын+Adv:мукӧдлаланьын ADV-IS_APRINE  "" ;
мукӧдлаӧд+Adv:мукӧдлаӧд ADV-IS_PRL  "" ;
мытсавмӧн+Adv:мытсавмӧн ADV-IS_GER-MON  "" ;
мышладорті+Adv:мышладорті ADV-IS_TRA  "" ;
мӧдарланьӧ+Adv:мӧдарланьӧ ADV-IS_APRILL  "" ;
мӧдарсянь+Adv:мӧдарсянь ADV-IS_EGR  "" ;
мӧдлаысь+Adv:мӧдлаысь ADV-IS_ELA  "" ;
мӧдлаланьысь+Adv:мӧдлаланьысь ADV-IS_APRELA  "" ;
мӧдысь+Adv:мӧдысь ADV-ITER_  "toiste" ;
мӧдысь-коймӧдысь+Adv:мӧдысь-коймӧдысь ORD-ITER-APPR  "" ;
нагавоч+Adv:нагавоч ADV-DEG_  "" ;
наизусьт+Adv:наизусть ADV_SUB  "ulkoa" ;
некор+Adv:некор ADV-NEG_  "ei koskaan" ;
некыдз+Adv:некыдз ADV-NEG_  "" ;
некӧні+v1+Adv:некӧні ADV-NEG_  "ei missään" ;
некӧні+v2+Adv:некӧн ADV-NEG_  "ei missään" ;
нетшыштӧмӧн+Adv:нетшыштӧмӧн ADV-IS_GER-OMON  "" ;
ньӧти% ошйысьтӧг+Adv:ньӧти% ошйысьтӧг ADV-IS_GER-TOG  "" ;
ортсылань+Adv:ортсылань ADV-IS_APR  "" ;
ортсӧ+Adv:ортсӧ ADV-IS_ILL  "" ;
пельысь-пельӧ+Adv:пельысь-пельӧ ADV_  "" ;
пластӧн-пластӧн+Adv:пластӧн-пластӧн ADV-IS_INS  "" ;
помтӧг+Adv:помтӧг ADV-IS_N-TOG  "" ;
пыдӧдз+Adv:пыдӧдз ADV-IS_TER  "" ;
пытшкӧсын+Adv:пытшкӧсын ADV-IS_INE  "" ;
рытгорув+Adv:рытгорул ADV_L  "" ;
садьтӧг+Adv:садьтӧг ADV-IS_N-TOG  "" ;
сайын+Adv:сай ADV-SPAT-INE  "" ;
сейчас+Adv:сейчас ADV-F  "" ;
серамбанӧн+Adv:серамбанӧн ADV-STATE  "" ;
судтӧг-радтӧг+Adv:судтӧг-радтӧг ADV-IS_N-TOG  "" ;
сыладорсянь+Adv:сыладорсянь ADV-IS_EGR  "" ;
сэки+v1+Adv:сэки ADV-TEMP_  "silloin" ;
сэнъясын+Adv:сэнъяс ADV-SPAT  "niissä paikoissa" ;
сэні+v1+Adv:сэні ADV-IS-INE_  "tuolla" ;
сэні+v2+Adv:сэн ADV-IS-INE-AND-COP-PL_  "tuolla" ;
сэтчӧ+v6+Adv+Err/Dial:сэче ADV-IS_ILL  "sinne" ;
сэті+Adv:сэті ADV-IS_TRA  "sitä kautta" ;
сё+Adv:сё ADV-DEG_  "" ;
сёймӧн+Adv:сёймӧн ADV-IS_GER-MON  "" ;
сёрӧдз+Adv:сёрӧдз ADV-IS_TER  "" ;
сёрӧник+Adv:сёрӧник ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
этадзи+v1+Adv:этадзи ADV-MANNER_  "" ;
этадзи+v2+Adv:этадз ADV-MANNER_  "" ;
сідзи+v1+Adv:сідзи ADV-MANNER_  "näin" ;
сідзи+v2+Adv:сідз ADV-MANNER_  "" ;
тадзи+v2+Adv:тадз ADV-MANNER_  "niin" ;
тадзинад+v1+Adv:тадзинад AdvParenthetic  "" ;
тадзинад+v2+Adv:тадзнад AdvParenthetic  "" ;
талун-аски+Adv:талун-аски ADV-TEMP_  "" ;
тані+v1+Adv:тані ADV-IS-INE_  "" ;
тані+v2+Adv:тан ADV-IS-INE-AND-COP-PL_  "täällä" ;
татысь+Adv:татысь ADV-IS_ELA  "täältä" ;
тиньгытӧдз+Adv:тиньгытӧдз ADV-VTER  "" ;
том% дырйи+Adv:том% дырйи ADV_  "nuorena" ;
томласьтӧг+Adv:томласьтӧг ADV-IS_GER-TOG  "" ;
торйӧдчигӧн+Adv:торйӧдчигӧн ADV-IS_GER-IGON  "" ;
туйтӧг+Adv:туйтӧг ADV-IS_N-TOG  "" ;
увлань+Adv:увлань ADV-IS_APR  "" ;
уналаланьӧ+Adv:уналаланьӧ ADV-IS_APRILL  "" ;
уналаланьын+Adv:уналаланьын ADV-IS_APRINE  "" ;
уналаӧд+Adv:уналаӧд ADV-IS_PRL  "" ;
унаысь+Adv:унаысь ADV-ITER_  "monesti" ;
унджыклаланьысь+Adv:унджыклаланьысь ADV-IS_APRELA  "" ;
чегмӧн+Adv:чегмӧн ADV-IS_GER-MON  "" ;
чистӧ+Adv:чистӧ ADV-DEG_  "" ;
шемӧсмӧмӧн+Adv:шемӧсмӧмӧн ADV-IS_GER-OMON  "" ;
шуасьтӧг+Adv:шуасьтӧг ADV-IS_GER-TOG  "" ;
шӧрвыйын+Adv:шӧрвыйын ADV-IS_INE  "" ;
шӧрӧдз+Adv:шӧрӧдз ADV-IS_TER  "" ;
ылӧд+Adv:ылӧд ADV-IS_PRL  "" ;
ылісянь+Adv:ылісянь ADV-IS_EGR  "" ;
ыліті+Adv:ыліті ADV-IS_TRA  "" ;
эбӧсвылысь+Adv:эбӧсвылысь ADV_  "" ;
этшаысь+Adv:этшаысьысь ADV-IS_ELA  "" ;
югдытӧдз+Adv:югдытӧдз ADV-IS_GER-TODZ  "" ;
юртӧг-садьтӧг+Adv:юртӧг-садьтӧг ADV-IS_N-TOG  "" ;
явнӧ+Adv:явн ADV_O2  "" ;
явӧ+Adv:яв ADV_O2  "ilmeisesti" ;
ӧбиднӧ+Adv:ӧбидн ADV_O2  "" ;
ӧдйӧ+Adv:ӧдй ADV_O2  "nopeasti" ;
ӧти-мӧдлаланьӧ+Adv:ӧти-мӧдлаланьӧ ADV-IS_APRILL  "" ;
ӧти-мӧдлаланьын+Adv:ӧти-мӧдлаланьын ADV-IS_APRINE  "" ;
ӧтиклаӧ+Adv:ӧтиклаӧ ADV-IS_ILL  "" ;
ӧтиклалань+Adv:ӧтиклалань ADV-IS_APR  "" ;
ӧтиклаланьысь+Adv:ӧтиклаланьысь ADV-IS_APRELA  "" ;
ӧтитӧг+Adv:ӧтитӧг ADV-IS_Q-TOG  "" ;
ӧткымынлаӧд+Adv:ӧткымынлаӧд ADV-IS_PRL  "" ;
ӧтпырйӧ+Adv:ӧтпырй ADV_O2  "kerrallaan" ;
ӧтчыдысь+Adv:ӧтчыдысь ADV-ITER_  "kerran" ;
